lt-LT: Kietmedžio medienos klasė: Pirmosios ir antrosios klasės (Firsts and Seconds, FAS); Nr. 1 bendroji; Nr. 2 bendroji; Nr. 2A bendroji; Nr. 2B bendroji; Nr. 3A bendroji; Nr. 3B bendroji; „Select“; Kita
pt-PT: Classe de madeira nobre: Primeiros e segundos (FAS); N.º 1 comum; N.º 2 comum; N.º 2A comum; N.º 2B comum; N.º 3A comum; N.º 3B comum; Seleção; Outro
zh-CN: 硬木木材等级: 一级和二级 (FAS); 一般等级 1; 一般等级 2; 2A普通; 2B普通; 3A普通; 3B普通; 选择级; 其他
nl: Kwaliteit looftimmerhout: Firsts and seconds (FAS); No. 1 common; No. 2 common; No. 2A common; No. 2B common; No. 3A common; No. 3B common; Select; Andere
sl-SI: Razred lesene deske: Prvi in drugi (FAS); Št. 1 pogost; Št. 2 pogost; Št. 2A pogost; Št. 2B pogost; Št. 3A pogost; Št. 3B pogost; Izbrano; Drugo
el: Βαθμός ξυλείας σκληρού ξύλου: Firsts and seconds (FAS); No. 1 common; No. 2 common; No. 2A common; No. 2B common; No. 3A common; No. 3B common; Select; Άλλο
pl: Gatunek drewna liściastego: Pierwsze i drugie miejsca (FAS); Nr 1 wspólny; Nr 2 wspólny; Nr 2A wspólny; Nr 2B i 2B wspólne; Nr 3A wspólny; Nr 3B i 2B wspólne; Wybierz; Inne
th: เกรดไม้อัดเนื้อแข็ง: เกรดหนึ่งและสอง (FAS); No. 1 common; No. 2 common; เกรด 2A ทั่วไป; เกรด 2B ทั่วไป; เกรด 3A ทั่วไป; เกรด 3B ทั่วไป; เกรดคัดพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
da: Hårdttræ tømmerkvalitet: Første og anden (FAS); Nr. 1 almindelig; Nr. 2 almindelig; Nr. 2A almindelig; Nr. 2B almindelig; Nr. 3A almindelig; Nr. 3B almindelig; Vælg; Andet
ru: Сорт лесоматериалов из лиственных пород: Первые и вторые (FAS); № 1 общие; № 2 общие; № 2А общие; № 2B общие; № 3А общие; № 3B общие; Выбрать; Другие
bg-BG: Клас дървен материал от твърда дървесина: Първи и втори (FAS); № 1 общ; № 2 общ; № 2A общ; № 2B общ; № 3A общ; № 3B общ; Избор; Други
cs: Třída řeziva z tvrdého dřeva: První a druhé (FAS); Běžná třída č. 1; Běžná třída č. 2; Běžné č. 2A; Běžné č. 2B; Běžné č. 3A; Běžné č. 3B; Výběr; Jiné
en: Hardwood lumber grade: Firsts and seconds (FAS); No. 1 common; No. 2 common; No. 2A common; No. 2B common; No. 3A common; No. 3B common; Select; Other
ro-RO: Grad cherestea din lemn de esență tare: Standard FAS; Nr. 1 comun; Nr. 2 comun; Nr. 2A comun; Nr. 2B comun; Nr. 3A comun; Nr. 3B comun; Select; Altele
sk-SK: Trieda reziva z tvrdého dreva: Prvé a sekundy (FAS); č.1 spoločný; č.2 spoločný; č. 2A spoločný; č. 2B spoločný; č. 3A spoločný; č. 3B spoločný; Vyberte; Iné
sv: Lövträvirkeskvalitet: Första- och andrasortering (FAS); Nr 1 vanlig; Nr 2 vanlig; Nr 2A vanlig; Nr 2B vanlig; Nr 3A vanlig; Nr 3B vanlig; Select; Övrigt
tr: Sertağaç kereste sınıfı: Birinciler ve ikinciler (FAS); 1 numaralı yaygın; 2 numaralı yaygın; No. 2A yaygın; No. 2B yaygın; No. 3A yaygın; No. 3B yaygın; Seçim; Diğer
ko: 견목재 등급: 첫 번째 & 두 번째(FAS); 1호 공통; 2호 공통; 2A 공통; 2B 공통; 3A 공통; 3B 공통; 선택; 기타
fi: Kovapuun sahatavaraluokka: Ensimmäiset ja toiset (FAS); Nro 1 yleinen; Nro 2 yleinen; Nro 2A yleinen; Nro 2B yleinen; Nro 3A yleinen; Nro 3B yleinen; Valita; Muu
de: Hartholzqualität: Firsts and Seconds (FAS); Nummer 1 Common; Nummer 2 Common; Nr. 2A Common; Nr. 2B Common; Nr. 3A Common; Nr. 3B Common; Select; Sonstiges
it: Classificazione del legno massiccio: Prima e seconda (FAS); N. 1 comune; N. 2 comune; N. 2A comune; N. 2B comune; N. 3A comune; N. 3B comune; Selezione; Altro
hu: Keményfa-fűrészáru besorolása: Kiváló minőségű; 1. osztályú, általános; 2. osztályú, általános; 2A osztályú, általános; 2B osztályú, általános; 3A osztályú, általános; 3B osztályú, általános; Válogatott; Egyéb
vi: Phân loại gỗ cứng: Hạng nhất và hạng hai (FAS); Hạng phổ thông loại 1; Hạng phổ thông loại 2; Số 2A chung; Số 2B chung; Số 3A chung; Số 3B chung; Lựa chọn; Khác
fr: Qualité du bois de feuillus: Premières et secondes (FAS); Commun n°1; Commun n°2; N° 2A commun; N° 2B commun; N° 3A commun; N° 3B commun; Select; Autre
hr-HR: Ocjena tvrdog drva: Prvi i drugi (FAS); Br. 1 uobičajeno; Br. 2 uobičajeno; Br. 2A uobičajeno; Br. 2B uobičajeno; Br. 3A uobičajeno; Br. 3B uobičajeno; Select; Ostalo
es: Grado de madera dura: Primero y segundo grado (FAS); Común No. 1; Común No. 2; N.º 2A común; N.º 2B común; N.º 3A común; N.º 3B común; Selecta; Otros
ja: 広葉樹材のグレード: ファースト&セカンド (FAS); No.1コモン; No.2コモン; No.2Aコモン; No.2Bコモン; No.3Aコモン; No.3Bコモン; セレクト; その他
zh-TW: 硬質木材等級: 一二級 (FAS); 普 1 級; 普 2 級; 普 2A 級; 普 2B 級; 普 3A 級; 普 3B 級; 精選級; 其他
pt-BR: Classe de madeira de lei: Primeiro e segundos (FAS); Nº 1 comum; Nº 2 comum; Nº2A comum; Nº2B comum; Nº3A comum; Nº3B comum; Seleção; Outro
nb: Løvtrekvalitet: Første og sekundær (FAS); Nr. 1 felles; Nr. 2 felles; Nr. 2A felles; Nr. 2B felles; Nr. 3A felles; Nr. 3B felles; Velg; Annet